Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-234
Nongame fish, defined.

Nongame fish means any species of fish not classified as game fish, threatened species, or endangered species in the Game Law or rules and regulations of the commission.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 44.